Nevada, session 83, AB429.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 111.420 is hereby amended to read as follows:
111.420 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 111.390 to
111.440, inclusive, [an] any person, including, without limitation,
a state or local government or any agency or instrumentality
thereof, may create, convey, record, assign, release, reserve,
modify, terminate or otherwise alter or affect an easement for
conservation [may be created, conveyed, recorded, assigned,
released, modified, terminated or otherwise altered or affected] in
the same manner as other easements.
2. No right or duty in favor of or against a holder and no right
of enforcement in favor of a third person arises under an easement
for conservation before it is accepted by the holder and the
acceptance is recorded.
3. An easement for conservation is unlimited in duration
unless:
(a) The instrument creating it otherwise provides; or
(b) A court orders that the easement be terminated or modified,
according to subsection 2 of NRS 111.430.
4. An interest in real property existing at the time the easement
for conservation is created is not impaired by the easement unless
the owner of the interest is a party to the easement or consents to it.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)